Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.330

Inpatient mental health treatment—Placement.

A dependent child who is admitted to an inpatient mental health facility shall be placed in a facility, with available treatment space, that is closest to the family home, unless the department, in consultation with the admitting authority finds that admission in the facility closest to the child's home would jeopardize the health or safety of the child.

[ 2018 c 284 s 26; 2009 c 520 s 41; 1999 c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—1999 c 188: See note following RCW 13.34.320.